Utah statutes.
57-11-5.   Registration, public offering statement, and receipt required for
sale of subdivided land -- Temporary permit -- Right of rescission.
Unless the subdivided lands or the transaction is exempt under Section
57-11-4, all of the following apply:
(1)  No person may offer or dispose of any interest in subdivided lands
located in this state nor offer or dispose in this state of any interest in
subdivided lands located outside of this state prior to the time the
subdivided lands are registered in accordance with this chapter.
(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), the division may grant a temporary permit
allowing the developer to begin a sales program while the registration is in
process.  In order to obtain a temporary permit the developer must:
(a)  submit an application to the division for a temporary permit in the form
required by the division;
(b)  submit a substantially complete application for registration to the
division, including all appropriate fees and exhibits required under Sections
57-11-6 and 57-11-7 in addition to a temporary permit fee of $100;
(c)  provide evidence acceptable to the division that all funds received by
the developer or marketing agent will be placed into an independent escrow
with instructions that funds will not be released until a final registration
has been granted;
(d)  give to each purchaser and potential purchaser a copy of the proposed
property report which the developer has submitted to the division with the
original application; and
(e)  give to each purchaser the opportunity to rescind the purchase in
accordance with this section.  The purchaser must be granted an additional
opportunity to rescind upon the issuance of an approved registration if the
division determines that there is a substantial difference in the disclosures
contained in the final property report and those given to the purchaser in the
proposed property report.
(3)  Any contract or agreement of disposition for an interest in subdivided
lands may be rescinded by the purchaser without cause by midnight of the fifth
calendar day after the execution of the contract or agreement of disposition.
This right of rescission may not be waived by agreement.  The contract or
agreement of disposition shall state in boldface type on the signature page
above all signatures: YOU HAVE THE OPTION TO CANCEL YOUR CONTRACT OR AGREEMENT
OF DISPOSITION BY NOTICE TO THE SELLER UNTIL MIDNIGHT OF THE FIFTH CALENDAR
DAY FOLLOWING THE SIGNING OF THE CONTRACT OR AGREEMENT.  WRITTEN NOTICE OF
CANCELLATION MUST BE PERSONALLY DELIVERED OR SENT BY CERTIFIED MAIL,
POSTMARKED BY MIDNIGHT OF THE FIFTH CALENDAR DAY FOLLOWING THE SIGNING OF THE
CONTRACT OR AGREEMENT, TO THE SELLER AT: (Address of Seller).
(4)  No person may dispose of any interest in subdivided lands without
delivering to the purchaser an effective, current public offering statement
and obtaining a dated, signed receipt for the public offering statement in a
form to be approved by the division from each purchaser.  The subdivider shall
retain each receipt for two years from the date of its execution.  All
receipts shall be made available for inspection upon request by the division.
Failure to comply with this subsection shall not constitute a cause of action
under Section 57-11-17 but shall be grounds for appropriate action by the
division under Sections 57-11-13 and 57-11-14.
